apertium-eo-en.eo.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 6568
	Sdefs: 91
	Paradigms: 42

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acc" /> 
    <sdef n="nomiacc" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="comp" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="past" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="qnt" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="obj" /> 
    <sdef n="subj" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="top" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaŭ" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="gerpast" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pp2" /> 
    <sdef n="pp3" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="subs" /> 
    <sdef n="pres" /> 
    <sdef n="pprs" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" /> 
    <sdef n="sint" /> 
    <sdef n="unc" /> 
    <sdef n="sep" /> 
    <sdef n="pron" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="adiós__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="ij"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="guionet">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-</l> 
        <r>-<s n="guio"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>,</l> 
        <r>,<s n="cm"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'</l> 
        <r>'<s n="apos"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
      <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sent"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
      <re>[¿¡]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
      <re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
      <re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- handle cx, etc. -->
    <pardef n="ĉ">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>cx</l> 
          <r>ĉ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ĉ</l> 
          <r>ĉ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ĝ">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gx</l> 
          <r>ĝ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ĝ</l> 
          <r>ĝ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ĥ">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hx</l> 
          <r>ĥ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ĥ</l> 
          <r>ĥ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ĵ">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jx</l> 
          <r>ĵ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ĵ</l> 
          <r>ĵ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ŝ">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sx</l> 
          <r>ŝ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ŝ</l> 
          <r>ŝ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ŭ">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ux</l> 
          <r>ŭ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ŭ</l> 
          <r>ŭ</r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="adj__adjINICIAL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adj__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aj</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ajn</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e i="yes">
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="komence__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kie__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="kial__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="very__preadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="preadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="after__cnjadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ke__cnjsub">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="at__pr">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mine__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="batala">
        <i>batala</i> 
        <par n="adj__adjINICIAL"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="adiaŭ">
        <i>adia</i><par n="ŭ"/><i></i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="antaŭen">
        <i>anta</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>en</i> 
        <par n="komence__adv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="aŭreolo">
        <i>a</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>reolo</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bonan matenon">
        <i>bonan<b/>matenon</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉeko">
        <par n="ĉ"/>
        <i>eko</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiu">
      <par n="ĉ"/>
      <p>
        <l>iu</l> 
        <r>iu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e lm="ekzemple">
        <i>ekzemple</i> 
        <par n="komence__adv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ekzemple">
        <i>ekzemple</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fondaĵo">
        <i>fonda</i><par n="ĵ"/><i>o</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fortika">
        <i>fortik</i> 
        <par n="adj__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fronte al">
        <i>fronte<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="at__pr"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĝiri">
        <par n="ĝ"/>
        <i>ir</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĝis poste">
        <par n="ĝ"/>
        <i>is<b/>poste</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĥaosa">
        <par n="ĥ"/>
        <i>aos</i> 
        <par n="adj__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĥimero">
        <par n="ĥ"/>
        <i>imero</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="iomete">
        <i>iomete</i> 
        <par n="komence__adv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĵeto">
        <par n="ĵ"/>
        <i>eto</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ke">
        <i>ke</i> 
        <par n="ke__cnjsub"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ke">
        <i>ke</i> 
        <par n="ke__cnjsub"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kial">
        <i>kial</i> 
        <par n="kial__adv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kiam">
        <i>kiam</i> 
        <par n="kial__adv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kie">
        <i>kie</i> 
        <par n="kie__rel"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kiel">
        <i>kiel</i> 
        <par n="kial__adv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kiel">
        <i>kiel</i> 
        <par n="and__cnjcoo"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="konsiderante">
        <i>konsiderante</i> 
        <par n="at__pr"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kontraŭnatura">
        <i>kontra</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>natur</i> 
        <par n="adj__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="koŝmaro">
        <i>ko</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>maro</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="krom se">
        <i>krom<b/>se</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malĝoja">
        <i>mal</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>oj</i> 
        <par n="adj__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mallarĝa">
        <i>mallar</i><par n="ĝ"/><i></i> 
        <par n="adj__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="monaĥejo">
        <i>mona</i><par n="ĥ"/><i>ejo</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tre">
        <i>multe</i> 
        <par n="very__preadv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ol">
        <i>ol</i> 
        <par n="and__cnjcoo"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pli">
        <i>pli</i> 
        <par n="very__preadv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="publike">
        <i>publike</i> 
        <par n="komence__adv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="riĉa">
        <i>ri</i><par n="ĉ"/><i></i> 
        <par n="adj__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="saluton">
        <i>saluton</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sed">
        <i>sed</i> 
        <par n="and__cnjcoo"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sekve">
        <i>sekve</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="spritaĵo">
        <i>sprita</i><par n="ĵ"/><i>o</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝanco">
        <par n="ŝ"/>
        <i>anco</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝanĝo">
        <par n="ŝ"/>
        <i>an</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>o</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tiel">
        <i>tiel</i> 
        <par n="very__preadv"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tra">
        <i>tra</i> 
        <par n="at__pr"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tuŝeti">
        <i>tu</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>et</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="urba">
        <i>urb</i> 
        <par n="adj__adj"/> 
    </e>
